Illinois, session 104th, SB2358.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title; references to Act. 5    (a) This Act may be cited as the Protecting Religious 6Assembly in States of Emergency Act.7    (b) References to Act. This Act may be referred to as the 8PRAISE Act. 9    Section 5. Definition. As used in this Act, "place of 10worship" means a church, synagogue, mosque, temple, or other 11building, structure, or place used primarily for religious 12worship and includes the grounds of the building, structure, 13or place. 14    Section 10. Protection for places of worship. An order, 15rule, regulation, ordinance, resolution, or other directive 16issued by the State government or a unit of local government 17pursuant to an emergency or health or safety determination, 18declaration, or proclamation that requires closure or 19limitation of any business or other facility otherwise open to 20public use or patronage, but which exempts in whole or in part 21any particular entity or set of entities, shall exempt to the 22same extent any place of worship of a religious organization   SB2358- 2 -LRB104 03775 JRC 13799 b1that is exempt from taxation under 26 CFR 501(c)(3) as the 2other entities are exempted. This Section shall be construed 3to afford to religious organizations and the organizations' 4places of worship the same degree of freedom to meet as is 5afforded to the most favored entity or set of entities. 6    Section 15. Enforcement. A person or religious 7organization burdened or impaired by a violation of Section 10 8may bring a civil action for relief against the burden or 9impairment in a circuit court. A court may provide the 10following, noninclusive relief: injunctive orders; 11compensatory damages; nominal damages; a finding of a 12violation; and, when malice or recklessness is demonstrated, 13punitive damages. 14    Section 20. Home rule. A home rule unit may not regulate 15places of worship in a manner inconsistent with this Act. This 16Act is a limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 of 17Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent 18exercise by home rule units of powers and functions exercised 19by the State. 20    Section 100. The Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 21is amended by changing Section 7 as follows: 22    (20 ILCS 3305/7)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1057)  SB2358- 3 -LRB104 03775 JRC 13799 b1    Sec. 7. Emergency Powers of the Governor. In the event of a 2disaster, as defined in Section 4, the Governor may, by 3proclamation declare that a disaster exists. Upon such 4proclamation, the Governor shall have and may exercise for a 5period not to exceed 30 days the following emergency powers; 6provided, however, that the lapse of the emergency powers 7shall not, as regards any act or acts occurring or committed 8within the 30-day period, deprive any person, firm, 9corporation, political subdivision, or body politic of any 10right or rights to compensation or reimbursement which he, 11she, it, or they may have under the provisions of this Act:12        (1) To suspend the provisions of any regulatory 13    statute prescribing procedures for conduct of State 14    business, or the orders, rules and regulations of any 15    State agency, if strict compliance with the provisions of 16    any statute, order, rule, or regulation would in any way 17    prevent, hinder or delay necessary action, including 18    emergency purchases, by the Illinois Emergency Management 19    Agency, in coping with the disaster.20        (2) To utilize all available resources of the State 21    government as reasonably necessary to cope with the 22    disaster and of each political subdivision of the State.23        (3) To transfer the direction, personnel or functions 24    of State departments and agencies or units thereof for the 25    purpose of performing or facilitating disaster response 26    and recovery programs.  SB2358- 4 -LRB104 03775 JRC 13799 b1        (4) On behalf of this State to take possession of, and 2    to acquire full title or a lesser specified interest in, 3    any personal property as may be necessary to accomplish 4    the objectives set forth in Section 2 of this Act, 5    including: airplanes, automobiles, trucks, trailers, 6    buses, and other vehicles; coal, oils, gasoline, and other 7    fuels and means of propulsion; explosives, materials, 8    equipment, and supplies; animals and livestock; feed and 9    seed; food and provisions for humans and animals; clothing 10    and bedding; and medicines and medical and surgical 11    supplies; and to take possession of and for a limited 12    period occupy and use any real estate necessary to 13    accomplish those objectives; but only upon the undertaking 14    by the State to pay just compensation therefor as in this 15    Act provided, and then only under the following 16    provisions:17            a. The Governor, or the person or persons as the 18        Governor may authorize so to do, may forthwith take 19        possession of property for and on behalf of the State; 20        provided, however, that the Governor or persons shall 21        simultaneously with the taking, deliver to the owner 22        or his or her agent, if the identity of the owner or 23        agency is known or readily ascertainable, a signed 24        statement in writing, that shall include the name and 25        address of the owner, the date and place of the taking, 26        description of the property sufficient to identify it,   SB2358- 5 -LRB104 03775 JRC 13799 b1        a statement of interest in the property that is being 2        so taken, and, if possible, a statement in writing, 3        signed by the owner, setting forth the sum that he or 4        she is willing to accept as just compensation for the 5        property or use. Whether or not the owner or agent is 6        known or readily ascertainable, a true copy of the 7        statement shall promptly be filed by the Governor or 8        the person with the Director, who shall keep the 9        docket of the statements. In cases where the sum that 10        the owner is willing to accept as just compensation is 11        less than $1,000, copies of the statements shall also 12        be filed by the Director with, and shall be passed upon 13        by an Emergency Management Claims Commission, 14        consisting of 3 disinterested citizens who shall be 15        appointed by the Governor, by and with the advice and 16        consent of the Senate, within 20 days after the 17        Governor's declaration of a disaster, and if the sum 18        fixed by them as just compensation be less than $1,000 19        and is accepted in writing by the owner, then the State 20        Treasurer out of funds appropriated for these 21        purposes, shall, upon certification thereof by the 22        Emergency Management Claims Commission, cause the sum 23        so certified forthwith to be paid to the owner. The 24        Emergency Management Claims Commission is hereby given 25        the power to issue appropriate subpoenas and to 26        administer oaths to witnesses and shall keep   SB2358- 6 -LRB104 03775 JRC 13799 b1        appropriate minutes and other records of its actions 2        upon and the disposition made of all claims.3            b. When the compensation to be paid for the taking 4        or use of property or interest therein is not or cannot 5        be determined and paid under item a of this paragraph 6        (4), a petition in the name of The People of the State 7        of Illinois shall be promptly filed by the Director, 8        which filing may be enforced by mandamus, in the 9        circuit court of the county where the property or any 10        part thereof was located when initially taken or used 11        under the provisions of this Act praying that the 12        amount of compensation to be paid to the person or 13        persons interested therein be fixed and determined. 14        The petition shall include a description of the 15        property that has been taken, shall state the physical 16        condition of the property when taken, shall name as 17        defendants all interested parties, shall set forth the 18        sum of money estimated to be just compensation for the 19        property or interest therein taken or used, and shall 20        be signed by the Director. The litigation shall be 21        handled by the Attorney General for and on behalf of 22        the State.23            c. Just compensation for the taking or use of 24        property or interest therein shall be promptly 25        ascertained in proceedings and established by judgment 26        against the State, that shall include, as part of the   SB2358- 7 -LRB104 03775 JRC 13799 b1        just compensation so awarded, interest at the rate of 2        6% per annum on the fair market value of the property 3        or interest therein from the date of the taking or use 4        to the date of the judgment; and the court may order 5        the payment of delinquent taxes and special 6        assessments out of the amount so awarded as just 7        compensation and may make any other orders with 8        respect to encumbrances, rents, insurance, and other 9        charges, if any, as shall be just and equitable.10        (5) When required by the exigencies of the disaster, 11    to sell, lend, rent, give, or distribute all or any part of 12    property so or otherwise acquired to the inhabitants of 13    this State, or to political subdivisions of this State, 14    or, under the interstate mutual aid agreements or compacts 15    as are entered into under the provisions of subparagraph 16    (5) of paragraph (c) of Section 6 to other states, and to 17    account for and transmit to the State Treasurer all funds, 18    if any, received therefor.19        (6) To recommend the evacuation of all or part of the 20    population from any stricken or threatened area within the 21    State if the Governor deems this action necessary.22        (7) To prescribe routes, modes of transportation, and 23    destinations in connection with evacuation.24        (8) To control ingress and egress to and from a 25    disaster area, the movement of persons within the area, 26    and the occupancy of premises therein.  SB2358- 8 -LRB104 03775 JRC 13799 b1        (9) To suspend or limit the sale, dispensing, or 2    transportation of alcoholic beverages, firearms, 3    explosives, and combustibles.4        (10) To make provision for the availability and use of 5    temporary emergency housing.6        (11) A proclamation of a disaster shall activate the 7    State Emergency Operations Plan, and political subdivision 8    emergency operations plans applicable to the political 9    subdivision or area in question and be authority for the 10    deployment and use of any forces that the plan or plans 11    apply and for use or distribution of any supplies, 12    equipment, and materials and facilities assembled, 13    stockpiled or arranged to be made available under this Act 14    or any other provision of law relating to disasters.15        (12) Control, restrict, and regulate by rationing, 16    freezing, use of quotas, prohibitions on shipments, price 17    fixing, allocation or other means, the use, sale or 18    distribution of food, feed, fuel, clothing and other 19    commodities, materials, goods, or services; and perform 20    and exercise any other functions, powers, and duties as 21    may be necessary to promote and secure the safety and 22    protection of the civilian population.23        (13) During the continuance of any disaster the 24    Governor is commander-in-chief of the organized and 25    unorganized militia and of all other forces available for 26    emergency duty. To the greatest extent practicable, the   SB2358- 9 -LRB104 03775 JRC 13799 b1    Governor shall delegate or assign authority to the 2    Director to manage, coordinate, and direct all resources 3    by orders issued at the time of the disaster.4        (14) Prohibit increases in the prices of goods and 5    services during a disaster.6    Nothing in this Act allows the Governor or any other 7governmental official to proclaim, declare, or otherwise issue 8any order that violates the Protecting Religious Assembly in 9States of Emergency Act. 10(Source: P.A. 102-485, eff. 8-20-21.)